Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1764.
hereby enacts as follows:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 502.2. Potentially Impacted Municipalities.--(a) A person who proposes a subdivision or development of land shall, within 10 days of submitting an application for preliminary plat approval, inform the county or regional planning commission and the governing body of each contiguous municipality in writing that the person's application may constitute a development of regional significance and impact if the application proposes a development listed under section 506-B(b).(b) Within 30 days of receiving a notification under subsection (a), a potentially impacted municipality or the county or regional planning commission may request an impact analysis under section 507-B.Section 2. Section 508 of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 508. Approval of Plats.--All applications for approval of a plat (other than those governed by Article VII), whether preliminary or final, shall be acted upon by the governing body or the planning agency within such time limits as may be fixed in the subdivision and land development ordinance but the governing body or the planning agency shall render its decision and communicate it to the applicant not later than 90 days following the date of the regular meeting of the governing body or the planning agency (whichever first reviews the application) next following the date the application is filed or after a final order of court remanding an application, provided that should the said next regular meeting occur more than 30 days following the filing of the application or the final order 20250HB1764PN2717 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the court, the said 90-day period shall be measured from the 30th day following the day the application has been filed.* * *(8) If the governing body, or planning agency designated to review applications under this article, requires an applicant to prepare and remit an impact analysis under Article V-B within 45 days of receipt of a preliminary application for approval of a plat, the period for review under this section shall not begin until the municipality determines that the proposed development is not a development of regional significance and impact or the applicant submits a written mitigation plan under section 509-B. If a municipality determines that the proposed development is not a development of regional significance and impact, the period of review shall be 90 days and begin on the date that the decision is communicated to the applicant. If a mitigation plan is required, the period of review shall be 120 days and shall begin on the date that the applicant submits the mitigation plan.Section 3. Section 509(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 509. Completion of Improvements or Guarantee Thereof Prerequisite to Final Plat Approval.--(a) [No] In addition to any condition imposed by a decision under section 511-B(d)(2), no plat shall be finally approved unless the streets shown on such plat have been improved to a mud-free or otherwise permanently passable condition, or improved as may be required by the subdivision and land development ordinance and any walkways, curbs, gutters, street lights, fire hydrants, shade trees, water mains, sanitary sewers, storm sewers and other improvements as may be required by the subdivision and land 20250HB1764PN2717 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development ordinance have been installed in accordance with such ordinance. In lieu of the completion of any improvements required as a condition for the final approval of a plat, including improvements or fees required pursuant to section 509(i), the subdivision and land development ordinance shall provide for the deposit with the municipality of financial security in an amount sufficient to cover the costs of such improvements or common amenities including, but not limited to, roads, storm water detention and/or retention basins and other related drainage facilities, recreational facilities, open space improvements, or buffer or screen plantings which may be required. The applicant shall not be required to provide financial security for the costs of any improvements for which financial security is required by and provided to the Department of Transportation in connection with the issuance of a highway occupancy permit pursuant to section 420 of the act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the "State Highway Law."* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE V-B DEVELOPMENTS OF REGIONAL SIGNIFICANCE AND IMPACTSection 501-B . Purposes. The purposes of this article are:(1) To authorize a comprehensive and coordinated review by a municipality regarding a proposed development of regional significance and impact.(2) To evaluate and mitigate potentially adverse impacts on community services, the economy, the environment, community character, transportation and infrastructure as a result of a development of regional significance and impact.20250HB1764PN2717 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) To develop cost-effective and reasonable accountability measures regarding a development of regional significance and impact.(4) To encourage timely, well-communicated and well-coordinated procedures to consider and authorize a development of regional significance and impact.(5) To encourage planning consistent with section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.Section 502-B . Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"DATA CENTER." ALL OR PART OF A FACILITY COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE BUSINESSES, OWNERS OR TENANTS, AND THAT MEETS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) IS PREDOMINANTLY USED TO HOUSE WORKING SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS.(2) HAS AN UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLY OR GENERATOR BACKUP POWER, OR BOTH, COOLING SYSTEMS, TOWERS AND OTHER TEMPERATURE CONTROL INFRASTRUCTURE.(3) HAS A PEAK DEMAND OF 25 MEGAWATTS OR GREATER."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Earth disturbance activity." A construction or other human activity, done for the purpose of land development, that disturbs the surface of land."Host municipality." A municipality in which a proposed land development will be located."Intermodal terminal." An area or building where the transportation mode for freight or passengers changes.20250HB1764PN2717 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Petroleum storage facility." A facility used to store gasoline, motor fuel or other petroleum products with a capacity of more than:(1) fifty thousand barrels, if the facility is within 1,000 feet of a water supply; or(2) two hundred thousand barrels."Quarry." An open excavation used for extracting minerals, rock, stone, sand, gravel or building materials."Truck stop facility." An establishment that provides fuel, parking and related goods and services to primarily support truck transportation with at least:(1) six diesel pumps;(2) five acres of truck parking; or(3) twenty truck parking spaces."Warehouse facility." A logistical, storage or distribution facility, including a truck terminal, fulfillment center or facility containing cross docking operations."Waste-handling facility." A structure or system designed for the collection, processing or disposal of solid waste, including hazardous wastes. The term includes a transfer station, processing plant, recycling plant and disposal system.Section 503-B . Applicability of article. Unless this article specifically provides to the contrary, this article supplements this act and does not supersede any other provision of this act or other law.Section 504-B . Scope of article. (a) Nonapplicability.--This article shall not apply to a person or legal entity that is regulated by any of the following acts:(1) The act of May 31, 1945 (P.L.1198, No.418), known as 20250HB1764PN2717 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act.(2) The act of April 27, 1966 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.31, No.1), known as The Bituminous Mine Subsidence and Land Conservation Act.(3) The act of September 24, 1968 (P.L.1040, No.318), known as the Coal Refuse Disposal Control Act.(4) The act of December 18, 1984 (P.L.1069, No.214), known as the Coal and Gas Resource Coordination Act.(5) The act of December 19, 1984 (P.L.1093, No.219), known as the Noncoal Surface Mining Conservation and Reclamation Act.(6) 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 (relating to development).(b) Construction.--(1) If a land development specified in section 506-B requires access to a State highway, nothing in this article shall be construed to supersede the department's exclusive jurisdiction over the State highway system or to modify the requirements in the department's regulations relating to highway occupancy permits.(2) A developer seeking access to a State highway must submit a complete highway occupancy permit application to the department's electronic permitting system, including the submission of a transportation impact study in accordance with the department's guidelines.Section 505-B. (Reserved).Section 506-B. Impact analysis.(a) Duty to prepare.--The governing body of a host municipality, or the planning agency designated to review applications under Article V on behalf of a host municipality, shall require an applicant to prepare and submit an impact 20250HB1764PN2717 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 analysis under section 507-B as a condition of receiving preliminary approval for land development if the governing body or planning agency determines that it is reasonably likely that subsection (b) applies or the governing body or planning agency has received a notification from a county or regional planning agency under section 502.2(b).(b) Types of development.--An impact analysis under section 507-B shall be required if a proposed land development consists of any of the following:(1) an airport;(2) A DATA CENTER;(2) (3) an intermodal terminal; (3) (4) a petroleum storage facility; (4) (5) a waste-handling facility or the cumulative expansion of an existing waste-handling facility that occurs during any three-year period and creates a significant degradation in the level of service with respect to traffic impact, as determined by regulations established by the department;(5) (6) a quarry or the cumulative expansion of an existing quarry that occurs during any three-year period and creates a significant degradation in the level of service with respect to traffic impact, as determined by regulations established by the department;(6) (7) a truck stop facility that creates a significant degradation in the level of service with respect to traffic impact, as determined by regulations established by the department;(7) (8) a warehouse facility that creates a significant degradation in the level of service with respect to traffic 20250HB1764PN2717 - 8 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 impact as determined by regulations established by the department;(8) (9) a land development in a watershed that is unstudied under the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, and involves at least 100 acres of contributory watershed that is upstream from the land development and at least 25 acres in total land area of earth disturbance activity associated with the land development;(9) (10) a land development in which the permittees of the receiving sewerage facilities for the development have submitted information that documents that the existing collection, conveyance and treatment system have an existing hydraulic or organic overload or five-year projected overload;(10) (11) a land development in which the permittees of the collection, conveyance and treatment system receiving facilities have certified to the host municipality that there is not capacity to receive and treat sewage flows from the development or that the additional wasteload from the development will create a hydraulic or organic overload or five-year projected overload ; or (11) (12) a land development within a host municipality that will result in:(i) In the case of a municipality with a population of 10,000 or more as determined by the most current decennial census:(A) the generation of 3,000 or more average daily trips or 1,500 vehicles per day; or(B) a significant impact on highway safety or 20250HB1764PN2717 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 traffic flow, as determined by standards established by the department.(ii) In the case of a municipality with a population of less than 10,000 as determined by the most current decennial census:(A) a significant impact on highway safety or traffic flow, as determined by standards established by the department;(B) the generation of 3,000 or more average daily trips or 1,500 vehicles per day;(C) the generation of 100 or more vehicle trips entering or exiting the development during any one-hour time period of any day of the week; or(D) for an existing site being redeveloped, the generation of 100 or more additional vehicle trips entering or exiting the development during any one-hour time period of any day of the week.Section 507-B . Contents of impact analysis. (a) Submission.--An applicant shall submit an impact analysis to the host municipality as required by section 506-B . (b) Costs.--An applicant shall be responsible for all costs involving the preparation and review of the impact analysis.(c) Contents.--An impact analysis under this section shall analyze the effect of the proposed land development on the host municipality and other affected municipalities and shall address all of the following:(1) A list of contiguous and affected municipalities and counties as determined by the applicant.(2) The financial impact regarding any expanded emergency and infrastructure services, including services 20250HB1764PN2717 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regarding police, fire, ambulance, medical care, sewer, water, transportation and utilities.(3) The disturbance of agricultural areas, forested areas and greenfields.(4) The effect on natural resources, historic resources and tourism, including parks, open spaces, historic structures, ethnic heritage sites, the character of neighborhoods and areas, historic landscapes, scenic views and wildlife habitats.(5) The effect on residential housing opportunities, including property values and the potential number and character of new housing units.(6) The redevelopment of brownfields or greyfields.(7) The likelihood that the proposed land development will spur other land development in the area.(8) Subject to traffic impact guidelines developed by the department, the effect on transportation and transportation infrastructure. Consideration shall be given to trip generation, trip distribution and area municipalities.(9) Any other matter that is required by an applicable provision in the municipal or multimunicipal ordinance that governs the host municipality or that is covered by an applicable provision in the municipal, multimunicipal or county comprehensive plan for the host municipality.(d) Distribution.--The impact analysis shall be distributed to all contiguous and affected municipalities and counties as described in subsection (c)(1) at least 10 days prior to the public hearing in section 508-B.Section 508-B . Classification as development of regional 20250HB1764PN2717 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 significance and impact.(a) Notice of public hearing.--(1) In addition to any other notice requirement under this act, a host municipality shall provide timely written notice of the public hearing under this section to:(i) each contiguous municipality; and(ii) each municipality that is potentially impacted by the proposed land development and identified in the impact analysis under section 507-B . (2) The notice shall specify that the host municipality is considering whether to classify the proposed land development as a development of regional significance and impact.(b) Public hearing.--(1) A host municipality shall conduct a public hearing to review the impact analysis under section 507-B and determine whether the proposed land development is a development of regional significance and impact.(2) A representative from a municipality receiving notice under subsection (a) may provide public comment to the host municipality regarding the issue of whether to classify the proposed land development as a development of regional significance and impact.(c) Decision .--The process by which a host municipality decides whether to classify a proposed land development as a development of regional significance and impact shall include the following:(1) The host municipality shall specifically consider the potential direct impacts on other municipalities.(2) The host municipality shall issue its decision in 20250HB1764PN2717 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 writing and provide specific reasons supporting its decision . (d) Effect.--Once a proposed land development is classified as a development of regional significance and impact, the proposed land development shall be subject to the provisions of this article.(e) Waiver.--The requirements of subsections (a), (b) and (c) may be waived if the applicant agrees in writing with the host municipality's proposed designation that the application constitutes a development of regional significance and impact for the purposes of this article.Section 509-B . Mitigation plan. (a) Submission.--An applicant must submit to the host municipality a written mitigation plan that explains the nature and extent of mitigation efforts to address any known or potential harm or negative effect cited by the host municipality in the classification of the proposed land development as a development of regional significance and impact under section 508-B . (b) Professional review.--An applicant must demonstrate that the mitigation plan submitted under this section has been reviewed and written comments have been prepared for the host municipality regarding the effect of the proposed mitigation measures on the public health, safety and welfare by:(1) A traffic engineer.(2) An individual who is:(i) licensed in this Commonwealth to perform services or activities related to the provisions of this article; and(ii) qualified by training and experience to perform such services or activities with technical competence.20250HB1764PN2717 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Costs.--An applicant shall pay for all costs involving the preparation and review of the mitigation plan.Section 510-B . Coordinated and expedited review. (a) Request.--An applicant may request a coordinated and expedited review of any aspect of a proposed development of regional significance and impact by the department, the Department of Environmental Protection or any other governmental entity whose approval is required for the proposed development.(b) Governmental cooperation.--The department, the Department of Environmental Protection or any other governmental entity whose approval is required for the proposed land development shall ensure adequate communication and cooperation by and between the governmental entities.(c) Submission of information.--In consultation with the department, the Department of Environmental Protection or any other governmental entity whose approval is required for the proposed land development, an applicant shall submit to each governmental entity the necessary information for review of the proposed land development.(d) Report.--Within 45 days after submission of all the necessary information under subsection (c) for a coordinated and expedited review, a governmental entity receiving the information shall prepare a written report of findings, comments and recommendations regarding the proposed land development and send the report to the applicant and host municipality.(e) Discretion of governmental entity.--(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department, the Department of Environmental Protection or any other governmental entity whose approval is required for the proposed land development to conduct a 20250HB1764PN2717 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coordinated and expedited review.(2) Upon the written consent of the applicant, the department, the Department of Environmental Protection or other governmental entity whose approval is required for the proposed land development may extend the time period under subsection (d).(f) Fees.--(1) An applicant shall pay for all fees involving coordinated and expedited review of a proposed development of regional significance and impact under this section.(2) Unless the applicant agrees otherwise, if the department, the Department of Environmental Protection or any other governmental entity whose approval is required for the proposed land development cannot complete the coordinated and expedited review and submit the report within the time period under subsection (d), the governmental entity shall return to the applicant the full amount of the fee collected under this section.Section 511-B . Municipal review and decision . (a) Hearing required.--The host municipality shall conduct a hearing to review a proposed development of regional significance and impact.(b) Considerations.--At the hearing the host municipality shall consider all of the following:(1) Subject to subsection (c), testimony and other information from:(i) The department.(ii) The Department of Environmental Protection.(iii) Other governmental entities whose approval is required for the proposed land development.20250HB1764PN2717 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The county in which the host municipality is located.(v) Contiguous municipalities.(vi) Municipalities that are potentially impacted by the proposed land development.(vii) Area school districts potentially impacted by the proposed land development.(viii) Concerned individuals, municipal and regional planners, engineers, persons potentially impacted by the proposed land development and other persons as determined by the host municipality.(2) The impact analysis under section 507-B and other reports concerning the proposed land development.(3) The mitigation plan under section 509-B . (4) Whether the proposed land development is consistent with an applicable provision in:(i) a municipal, multimunicipal or county comprehensive plan; and(ii) a municipal or multimunicipal ordinance or regulation.(5) The totality of impacts regarding the proposed land development and the cumulative effect of development on the host municipality and affected municipalities.(c) Testimony.--The host municipality may limit the testimony to be presented at the hearing if the testimony is repetitive.(d) Decision .--Based on the testimony and other information received with respect to a proposed development of regional significance and impact, the host municipality shall render a written decision under this section within 120 days of the 20250HB1764PN2717 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submission of the mitigation plan. The host municipality's decision may:(1) Approve the proposed development.(2) Approve the proposed development with conditions attached. A condition shall be reasonably fashioned to mitigate any impact or additional impact attributable to the proposed development and shall bear a direct relationship to the burden being imposed by the proposed development. A condition may include offsite improvements to public facilities. A condition may not involve any of the following:(i) The correction of an existing deficiency in the environment or public infrastructure.(ii) A contribution or payment for the acquisition of land or expansion of public facilities, unless the host municipality's municipal ordinance contains the same or a similar condition for development that is not subject to this article.(iii) The contribution or payment associated with the cost of a municipal improvement that exceeds the proposed development's proportionate share of the cost established under this article or any applicable provision of this act or other law or ordinance. By accepting the proposed development's proportionate share, the host municipality assures that the municipal improvement will be made without any additional contribution or payment from the applicant for that purpose.(3) Disapprove the proposed development.(e) Reasons.--The host municipality shall provide specific reasons that support its decision under subsection (d). 20250HB1764PN2717 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Conditions of approval.--A condition imposed under subsection (d)(2) shall be deemed an improvement or other condition necessary for final approval under section 509.Section 512-B . Additional standards and criteria. (a) Ordinance.--Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict a municipality from establishing additional standards and criteria under this article by ordinance, in conformity with this act, including:(1) thresholds under subsection 506-B ; (2) the contents of an impact analysis under section 507-B(c) ; (3) the classification of a development of regional significance and impact under section 508-B ; and (4) considerations under section 511-B(b) . (b) Adoption of ordinance.--(1) Before voting on the enactment or amendment of a proposed ordinance under this section, the governing body shall hold a public hearing on the proposed ordinance pursuant to public notice. A brief summary stating the principal provisions of the proposed ordinance and a reference to the place within the municipality where copies of the proposed ordinance may be secured or examined shall be incorporated in the public notice.(2) Unless the proposed ordinance was prepared by the planning agency, the governing body shall submit the ordinance to the planning agency at least 30 days prior to the hearing on the ordinance to provide the planning agency an opportunity to submit recommendations.(3) If a county or regional planning agency exists for the county in which the municipality adopting the ordinance 20250HB1764PN2717 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is located, the municipality shall submit, at least 30 days prior to the public hearing on the ordinance, the proposed ordinance to the county or regional planning agency for recommendations.(4) Within 30 days after adoption, the governing body of a municipality, other than a county, shall forward a certified copy of the ordinance to the county planning agency or, in a county where no planning agency exists, to the governing body of the county in which the municipality is located.(c) Changes.--Changes in the ordinance shall affect applications as provided in section 508(4).Section 513-B . Financial considerations. (a) Applicant costs.--The host municipality or the county in which the host municipality is located may provide financial incentives to an applicant to mitigate the costs regarding an impact analysis, a mitigation plan or a coordinated and expedited review of a proposed development of regional significance and impact.(b) Revenue sharing.--The host municipality shall develop a revenue sharing plan for contiguous municipalities adversely affected by an approved development of regional significance and impact as a result of additional expenses incurred for police and fire protection, medical services, road maintenance and infrastructure.(c) Professional review.--If a host municipality lacks capacity regarding the professional review of the proposed land development plans, the impact analysis or the mitigation plan, the county in which the host municipality is located shall determine whether and the extent to which the county can assist 20250HB1764PN2717 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the host municipality with the professional review.Section 514-B . Notice generally. Except as otherwise provided in this article, this act shall govern notice of a public hearing, hearing or decision . Written notice shall be given to the applicant, an owner of property that is contiguous to the proposed land development and other person requesting a copy of the notice. A municipality shall provide, as appropriate, timely written notification to a contiguous municipality, municipality or area school district potentially impacted by the proposed land development.Section 515-B . Appeals. (a) Jurisdiction.--An appeal of a decision under section 511-B must be filed with the court of common pleas of the county in which the host municipality which made the decision is located.(b) Parties.--An appeal under this section shall be limited to those parties that appeared before the host municipality at the hearing.(c) Review.--The review of the decision under section 511-B shall be governed by Article X-A.(d) Mediation.--Parties to a contested case may use mediation as an aid to a formal appeal, in which case the provisions of section 908.1 shall govern.Section 5. Section 909.1(b) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 909.1. Jurisdiction.--* * *(b) The governing body or, except as to clauses (3), (4) and (5), the planning agency, if designated, shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear and render final adjudications in the following matters:20250HB1764PN2717 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(8) Applications for a proposed land development under Article V-B . Section 6. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1764PN2717 - 21 - 1234